Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE E. SPECIAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO MENTAL ILLNESS AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

CHAPTER 615. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 615.001. COUNTY RESPONSIBILITY. Each commissioners court shall provide for the support of a person with mental illness or an intellectual disability who is:

(1) a resident of the county;

(2) unable to provide self-support; and

(3) cannot be admitted to a state mental health or intellectual disability facility.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1500, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 615.002. ACCESS TO RECORDS BY PROTECTION AND ADVOCACY SYSTEM. (a) Notwithstanding other state law, the protection and advocacy system established in this state under the federal Protection and Advocacy for Individuals with Mental Illness Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 10801 et seq.) and the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.) is entitled to access to records relating to persons with mental illness or developmental disabilities to the extent authorized by federal law.

(b) If the person consents to notification, the protection and advocacy system shall notify the Department of State Health Services or the Department of Aging and Disability Services, as appropriate, if the system decides to investigate a complaint of abuse, neglect, or rights violation that relates to a person with mental illness or a developmental disability who is a patient or client in a facility or program operated by, licensed by, certified by, or in a contractual relationship with that department.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1500, eff. April 2, 2015.